District of Columbia statutes.
4-208.01

Determination by Mayor; method of payment.

(a)

Upon completion of the investigation pursuant to subchapter IX of this chapter, the Mayor shall determine whether the applicant is eligible for public assistance, the type and amount of public assistance for which he or she is eligible, and the date from which public assistance shall begin. The Mayor shall furnish public assistance with reasonable promptness to each person to whom the Mayor, in his or her discretion, provides public assistance. For the TANF, POWER, and GAC programs, an application for assistance shall be effective on the date that the application is filed. The amount payable for the initial month shall be prorated by multiplying the amount payable if payment were made for the entire month by the ratio of the days in the month including and following the date of application to the total number of days in a month.

(b)

Money payments of public assistance shall be made by check or electronic benefit transfer, except that in emergency cases money payments of public assistance may be made in cash, and to accomplish such purpose the Mayor may make necessary provisions for advancing from time to time to one or more officers or employees of the District such sum or sums as the Mayor may determine; provided, that no such advance shall be made to any such officer or employee who has not been previously bonded in such amount and form as the Mayor shall determine.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 801, 29 DCR 1060
Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-53, § 2(c), 30 DCR 6278
Sept. 10, 1985, D.C. Law 6-35, § 2(n), 32 DCR 3778
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-27, § 2(i), 38 DCR 4205
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 701(r), 44 DCR 7378
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(yy), (zz), 46 DCR 905
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 15(b), 46 DCR 2118
Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(yy) and (zz) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(yy) and (zz) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682), § 2(yy) and (zz) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(yy) and (zz) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 701(r) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and see § 701(r) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(r) of the General Public Assistance Program Termination Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-72, May 12, 1997, 44 DCR 2989).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(i) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Recess Emergency Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-69, July 24, 1991, 38 DCR 4945).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(i) of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-37, May 17, 1991, 38 DCR 3390).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(yy), (zz) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 701(r) of Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-59, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2094).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(r) of General Public Assistance Program Termination Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-21, September 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5760).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 101(i) of Omnibus Budget Support Temporary Act of 1991 (D.C. Law 9-19, June 21, 1991, law notification 38 DCR 5786).
1981 Ed., § 3-208.1.